Utah statutes.
72-7-516.   Relocating outdoor advertising structure to maintain required
distance from high voltage overhead lines.
(1)  If an outdoor advertising structure needs to be moved away from a high
voltage power line or lines so that the sign can be reposted or maintenance
performed without having to comply with the distance or notification
requirements of Section 54-8c-2, or in order to comply with distance or
notification requirements imposed by the National Electrical Safety Code,
International Building Code, a regulation, standard, or directive of the
Occupational Safety and Health Administration or any other similar applicable
regulation, then the owner shall have the option to remodel the structure at
the same location or relocate and remodel the structure to another location
within the same jurisdiction:
(a)  on the same property;
(b)  on adjacent property;
(c)  within 2,640 feet of the previous location on either side of the same
highway; or
(d)  mutually agreed upon by the owner and the county or municipality in which
the structure is located.
(2)  The relocation under Subsection (1) shall be in a commercial or
industrial zoned area or where outdoor advertising is permitted under this
part.
(3)  The county or municipality in which the structure is located shall, if
necessary, provide for the relocation or remodeling by ordinance for a special
exception to its zoning ordinance.
(4)  The relocated and remodeled structure may be:
(a)  erected to a height and angle to make it clearly visible to traffic on
the main-traveled way of the highway to which it is relocated or remodeled;
(b)  the same size and at least the same height as the previous structure, but
the relocated structure may not exceed the size and height permitted under
this part; and
(c)  relocated to a location with a comparable traffic vehicular count.
(5)  If a governmental entity prohibits the relocation and remodeling as
provided in Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c), it shall pay just compensation as
provided in Subsection 72-7-510(3).
